nl: Kleding en accessoires > Kleding > Uniformen en werkkleding > Schooluniformen: Gymkleding voor school; Schooluniformblazers en -bovenkleding; Schooluniformjurken en -overgooiers; Schooluniformbroeken en -shorts; Schooluniformrokken; Schooluniformtruien en -breigoed; Schooluniformtops
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > เสื้อผ้า > เครื่องแบบและชุดทำงาน > เครื่องแบบของโรงเรียน: ชุดพละโรงเรียน; เสื้อเบลเซอร์และเสื้อตัวนอกชุดนักเรียน; ชุดเดรสและเอี๊ยมกระโปรงชุดนักเรียน; กางเกงขายาวและกางเกงขาสั้นชุดนักเรียน; กระโปรงชุดนักเรียน; เสื้อสเวตเตอร์และเสื้อไหมพรมชุดนักเรียน; เสื้อชุดนักเรียน
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Abbigliamento > Uniformi e abbigliamento da lavoro > Uniformi scolastiche: Divise per educazione fisica; Blazer e capispalla per divise scolastiche; Abiti e scamiciati per divise scolastiche; Pantaloni e pantaloncini per divise scolastiche; Gonne per divise scolastiche; Maglioni e maglieria per divise scolastiche; Maglie per divise scolastiche
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Bekleidung > Uniformen & Arbeitskleidung > Schuluniformen: Schulsportbekleidung; Schuluniform-Blazer & -Oberbekleidung; Schuluniform-Kleider & -Trägerkleider; Schuluniform-Hosen & -Shorts; Schuluniform-Röcke; Schuluniform-Pullover & -Strickwaren; Schuluniform-Oberteile
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Giyim Eşyaları > Üniformalar ve İş Giysileri > Okul Üniformaları: Okul beden eğitimi üniformaları; Okul üniforması blazerları ve dış giyimi; Okul üniforması elbiseleri ve jileleri; Okul üniforması pantolonları ve şortları; Okul üniforması etekleri; Okul üniforması kazakları ve trikoları; Okul üniforması üstleri
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Roupas > Uniformes e roupas de trabalho > Uniformes escolares: Uniformes de educação física escolar; Blazers e agasalhos de uniforme escolar; Vestidos e jardineiras de uniforme escolar; Calças e bermudas de uniforme escolar; Saias de uniforme escolar; Suéteres e malhas de uniforme escolar; Camisetas e blusas de uniforme escolar
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Одежда > Униформа и спецодежда > Школьная форма: Школьная спортивная форма; Школьные блейзеры и верхняя одежда; Школьные платья и сарафаны; Школьные брюки и шорты; Школьные юбки; Школьные свитеры и трикотаж; Школьные рубашки и блузки
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Облекло > Униформи и работно облекло > Ученически униформи: Училищни униформи за физическо възпитание; Униформени сака и връхни дрехи за училище; Униформени рокли и пуловери за училище; Униформени панталони и шорти за училище; Ученически униформени поли; Ученически униформени пуловери и плетива; Ученически униформени блузи
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 服装 > 制服和工作服 > 校服: 学校体育服; 校服西装与外套; 校服连衣裙和背心裙; 校服长裤与短裤; 校服裙; 校服毛衣与针织衫; 校服上衣
es: Ropa y accesorios > Prendas de vestir > Uniformes y ropa de trabajo > Uniformes de colegio: Uniformes de educación física escolar; Blazers y prendas de abrigo de uniforme escolar; Vestidos y jumpers de uniforme escolar; Pantalones y shorts de uniforme escolar; Faldas de uniforme escolar; Suéteres y prendas de punto de uniforme escolar; Tops de uniforme escolar
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Odjeća > Uniforme i radna odjeća > Školske uniforme: Školske uniforme za tjelesni odgoj; Sakoi i odjeća za van za školske uniforme; Haljine i džemperi za školske uniforme; Hlače i kratke hlače za školske uniforme; Suknje za školsku uniformu; Džemperi i pletenina za školsku uniformu; Gornji dijelovi odjeće za školsku uniformu
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Klesplagg > Uniformer og arbeidstøy > Skoleuniformer: Gymtøy for skole; Skoleuniformblazere og yttertøy; Skoleuniformkjoler og snekkerkjoler; Skoleuniformbukser og shorts; Skoleuniformskjørt; Skolegensere og strikkeplagg; Skoleuniformtopper
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Odzież > Uniformy i odzież robocza > Mundurki szkolne: Stroje na lekcje wychowania fizycznego; Marynarki i odzież wierzchnia do mundurków szkolnych; Sukienki i fartuszki do mundurków szkolnych; Spodnie i szorty do mundurków szkolnych; Spódnice do mundurków szkolnych; Swetry i dzianiny do mundurków szkolnych; Górne części mundurków szkolnych
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Oblečenie > Uniformy a pracovné odevy > Školské uniformy: Školské uniformy na telesnú výchovu; Školské uniformy, saká a vrchné oblečenie; Školské uniformy, šaty a svetre; Nohavice a šortky školskej uniformy; Sukne pre školské uniformy; Svetre a pletené oblečenie pre školské uniformy; Topy pre školské uniformy
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Ruházat > Egyenruhák és munkaruházat > Iskolai egyenruhák: Iskolai testnevelés-felszerelések; Iskolai egyenruha-blézerek és felsőruházat; Iskolai egyenruhák és kötényruhák; Iskolai egyenruha-nadrágok és rövidnadrágok; Iskolai egyenruha-szoknyák; Iskolai egyenruha-pulóverek és kötöttáruk; Iskolai egyenruha-felsők
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Vaatteet > Univormut ja työvaatteet > Koulupuvut: Koulun liikuntavaatteet; Koulupuvun bleiserit ja päällysvaatteet; Koulupuvun mekot ja liivimekot; Koulupuvun housut ja shortsit; Koulupuvun hameet; Koulupuvun neuleet; Koulupuvun paidat
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Oblačila > Uniforme in delovna oblačila > Šolske uniforme: Šolske uniforme za športno vzgojo; Šolske uniforme Suknjiči in vrhnja oblačila; Šolske uniforme Obleke in puloverji; Šolske uniforme Hlače in kratke hlače; Šolska uniforma Krila; Šolska uniforma Puloverji in pletenine; Šolska uniforma Zgornji deli
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Oblečení > Uniformy a pracovní oděvy > Školní uniformy: Školní úbory na tělocvik; Školní uniformy – blejzry a svrchní oděvy; Školní uniformy – šaty a šatové sukně; Školní uniformy – kalhoty a šortky; Školní uniformy – sukně; Školní uniformy – svetry a pleteniny; Školní uniformy – horní díly
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 의류 > 유니폼 및 작업복 > 교복: 학교 체육복; 교복 블레이저 및 아우터; 교복 원피스 및 점퍼; 교복 바지 및 반바지; 교복 치마; 교복 스웨터 및 니트웨어; 교복 상의
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Vêtements > Uniformes et vêtements de travail > Uniformes scolaires: Tenues d’éducation physique scolaire; Blazers et manteaux d’uniforme scolaire; Robes et chasubles d’uniforme scolaire; Pantalons et shorts d’uniforme scolaire; Jupes d’uniforme scolaire; Pulls et tricots d’uniforme scolaire; Hauts d’uniforme scolaire
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Ενδύματα > Στολές και ρούχα εργασίας > Σχολικές στολές: Σχολικές στολές γυμναστικής; Σακάκια και πανωφόρια σχολικής στολής; Φορέματα και σαλοπέτες σχολικής στολής; Παντελόνια και σορτς σχολικής στολής; Φούστες σχολικής στολής; Πουλόβερ και πλεκτά σχολικής στολής; Μπλούζες σχολικής στολής
en: Apparel & Accessories > Clothing > Uniforms & Workwear > School Uniforms: School Physical Education Uniforms; School Uniform Blazers & Outerwear; School Uniform Dresses & Jumpers; School Uniform Pants & Shorts; School Uniform Skirts; School Uniform Sweaters & Knitwear; School Uniform Tops
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Îmbrăcăminte > Uniforme și haine de lucru > Uniforme școlare: Uniforme pentru educație fizică școlară; Blazere și îmbrăcăminte de exterior pentru uniformă școlară; Rochii și salopete pentru uniformă școlară; Pantaloni și pantaloni scurți de uniformă școlară; Fuste de uniformă școlară; Pulovere și tricotaje de uniformă școlară; Bluze de uniformă școlară
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Quấn áo > Đồng phục và đồ bảo hộ lao động > Đồng phục trường học: Đồng phục thể dục trường học; Áo blazer và áo khoác đồng phục trường học; Váy đồng phục trường học; Quần dài và quần soóc đồng phục trường học; Chân váy đồng phục trường học; Áo len và đồ dệt kim đồng phục trường học; Áo đồng phục trường học
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 衣料品 > ユニフォーム・作業服 > 学生服: 体操服; スクールブレザー・アウター; 制服ワンピース・ジャンパースカート; スクールパンツ・ショーツ; スクールスカート; スクールセーター・ニット; スクールトップス
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 衣著 > 制服與工作服 > 校服: 學校體育服; 學生制服西裝與外套; 學生制服洋裝與背心裙; 學生制服長短褲; 學生制服裙; 學生制服毛衣與針織衫; 學生制服上衣
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tøj > Uniformer og arbejdstøj > Skoleuniformer: Idrætstøj til skolen; Skoleblazere og overtøj; Skolekjoler; Skolebukser og -shorts; Skolenederdele; Skoletrøjer og -strik; Overdele til skoleuniformer
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Drabužiai > Uniformos ir darbo drabužiai > Mokyklinės uniformos: Mokyklinės kūno kultūros uniformos; Mokyklinės uniformos švarkai ir viršutiniai drabužiai; Mokyklinės uniformos suknelės ir megztiniai; Mokyklinės uniformos kelnės ir šortai; Mokyklinių uniformų sijonai; Mokyklinių uniformų megztiniai ir trikotažas; Mokyklinių uniformų viršutinė dalis
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Klädsel > Uniformer och arbetskläder > Skoluniformer: Skolidrottskläder; Skoluniformskavajer och ytterkläder; Skoluniformsklänningar och -jumprar; Skoluniformsbyxor och -shorts; Skoluniformskjolar; Skoluniformströjor och stickat; Skoluniformstoppar
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Vestuário > Uniformes e vestuário de trabalho > Uniformes escolares: Equipamentos de educação física escolar; Blazers e roupa exterior de uniforme escolar; Vestidos e jardineiras de uniforme escolar; Calças e calções de uniforme escolar; Saias de uniforme escolar; Camisolas e malhas de uniforme escolar; Tops de uniforme escolar